cs: Stav těsta: Suchá směs; Mražený; Zcela upečený; Nepečený; Předpečený; Syrový (nepečený); Chlazený; Ostatní
pl: Stan spodu ciasta: Sucha mieszanka; Mrożone; W pełni upieczone; Bez pieczenia; Wstępnie upieczone; Surowe (nieupieczone); Schłodzone; Inne
fr: État de la pâte ou du fond de pâtisserie: Mélange sec; Surgelé; Entièrement cuit; Sans cuisson; Précuit; Cru (non cuit); Réfrigéré; Autre
ru: Состояние коржа: Сухая смесь; Замороженная; Полностью испеченная; Без выпечки; Полувыпеченная; Сырая (неиспеченная); Охлажденная; Другое
it: Stato della pasta per dolci: Preparato secco; Surgelato; Cotto; Senza cottura; Precotto; Crudo (da cuocere); Refrigerato; Altro
el: Κατάσταση κρούστας ζύμης: Ξηρό μείγμα; Κατεψυγμένη; Πλήρως ψημένη; Χωρίς ψήσιμο; Μισοψημένη; Ωμή (άψητη); Ψυγείου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stanje kore tijesta: Suha mješavina; Smrznuto; Potpuno pečeno; Bez pečenja; Djelomično pečeno; Sirovo (nepečeno); Hlađeno; Ostalo
nl: Deegbodem staat: Droge mix; Bevroren; Volledig afgebakken; No-bake; Voorgebakken; Rauw (ongebakken); Gekoeld; Overig
da: Tærteskorpens tilstand: Tørblanding; Frossen; Færdigbagt; Skal ikke bages; Forbagt; Rå (ubagt); Kølet; Andet
pt-PT: Estado da crosta da massa: Mistura seca; Congelada; Totalmente cozida; Sem cozedura; Pré-cozida; Crua (por cozer); Refrigerada; Outro
sk-SK: Stav pečivového cesta: Suchá zmes; Mrazené; Úplne upečené; Nepečené; Predpečené; Surové (neupečené); Chladené; Iné
lt-LT: Kepinio pagrindo būsena: Sausas mišinys; Šaldyta; Visiškai iškepta; Nekepta; Apkepta; Žalia (nekepta); Atvėsinta; Kita
bg-BG: Състояние на тестената кора: Суха смес; Замразено; Напълно изпечено; Без печене; Полуизпечено; Сурово (неизпечено); Охладено; Друго
nb: Tilstand på bakverksskorpe: Tørrblanding; Frossen; Ferdigstekt; Skal ikke stekes; Halvstekt; Rå (ustekt); Kjølt; Annet
hu: Süteménytészta állapota: Száraz keverék; Fagyasztott; Teljesen megsütött; Sütés nélküli; Elősütött; Nyers (sütés nélküli); Hűtött; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estado da crosta de massa folhada: Mistura seca; Congelado; Totalmente assada; Não vai ao forno; Pré-assada; Crua (não assada); Refrigerado; Outro
de: Zustand des Teigbodens: Trockenmischung; Gefroren; Vollständig gebacken; Ohne Backen; Vorgebacken; Roh (ungebacken); Gekühlt; Sonstige
en: Pastry crust state: Dry mix; Frozen; Fully baked; No-bake; Par-baked; Raw (unbaked); Refrigerated; Other
zh-CN: 糕点饼皮状态: 干拌粉; 冷冻; 全熟; 免烤; 半熟; 生（未烤）; 冷藏; 其他
th: สถานะของเปลือกขนมอบ: ส่วนผสมแห้ง; แช่แข็ง; อบสุกเต็มที่; ไม่ต้องอบ; อบสุกบางส่วน; ดิบ (ยังไม่อบ); แช่เย็น; อื่นๆ
es: Estado de la corteza de hojaldre: Mezcla seca; Congelada; Totalmente horneada; Sin cocción; Prehorneada; Cruda (sin hornear); Refrigerada; Otro
sl-SI: Stanje testa za pite: Suha mešanica; Zamrznjeno; Popolnoma pečeno; Brez peke; Delno pečeno; Surovo (nepečeno); Ohlajeno; Drugo
vi: Trạng thái vỏ bánh ngọt: Hỗn hợp khô; Đông lạnh; Nướng chín hoàn toàn; Không cần nướng; Nướng sơ; Sống (chưa nướng); Bảo quản lạnh; Khác
zh-TW: 糕點餅皮狀態: 預拌粉; 冷凍; 全烤熟; 免烤; 半烤熟; 生 (未烘烤); 冷藏; 其他
tr: Hamur kabuğu durumu: Kuru karışım; Dondurulmuş; Tam pişmiş; Pişirme gerektirmeyen; Yarı pişmiş; Çiğ (pişmemiş); Soğutulmuş; Diğer
ro-RO: Starea crustei pentru produse de patiserie: Amestec uscat; Congelat; Copt complet; Fără coacere; Pre-copt; Crud (ne-copt); Refrigerat; Altele
fi: Leivonnaispohjan tila: Kuivaseos; Pakastettu; Valmiiksi paistettu; Paistamaton; Esipaistettu; Raaka (paistamaton); Jäähdytetty; Muu
ja: パイクラストの状態: ドライミックス; 冷凍; 焼成済み; 焼かない; 半焼成; 生（未焼成）; 冷蔵; その他
sv: Skorpans tillstånd: Torrmix; Fryst; Färdiggräddad; Utan gräddning; Förgräddad; Rå (ogräddad); Kyld; Övrigt
ko: 페이스트리 크러스트 상태: 드라이 믹스; 냉동; 완전히 구워짐; 노베이크; 초벌구이; 생지(굽지 않음); 냉장; 기타